Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 1 General Provisions

21-2-400.
Duty of superintendent to obtain cards of instruction, blank forms of oaths, and other forms and supplies; preparation and distribution of sample or facsimile ballot labels.

Prior to each primary and election, the superintendent shall obtain from the Secretary of State a sufficient number of cards of instruction for guidance of electors. Such cards of instruction shall include such portions of this chapter as deemed necessary by the Secretary of State and shall be printed for the type of voting equipment or ballots used in the county or municipality. The superintendent shall also obtain from the Secretary of State a sufficient number of blank forms of oaths of poll officers, voter’s certificates, voting rights posters, notices of penalties, oaths of assisted electors, numbered list of voters, tally sheets, return sheets, and such other forms and supplies required by this chapter, in each precinct of the county or municipality.

As an aid to electors, sample ballots or ballot labels may be printed and published in any newspaper generally and regularly circulated within the county or municipality, so long as the facsimile is labeled “Sample Ballot” and is at least 25 percent larger or smaller than the official ballot. Reprints of such newspaper printings may be procured and distributed by any elector. Election officials may also prepare and distribute sample ballots or ballot labels or portions thereof, provided they are labeled “Sample Ballot” and are of a different color and at least 25 percent larger or smaller than the official ballot or ballot label.

The superintendent shall prepare sample or facsimile ballots or ballot labels, as the case may be, for each general election which shall contain each question and the candidates who are offering for election for each office which will be voted upon in the county or municipality for distribution upon request to interested electors. Such sample or facsimile ballots or ballot labels shall comply with Code Section 21-2-575.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1237; Code 1868, § 1318; Code 1873, § 1291; Code 1882, § 1291; Ga. L. 1895, p. 23, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 76; Ga. L. 1900, p. 69, §§ 1, 3; Civil Code 1910, §§ 86, 87; Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, § 7; Code 1933, §§ 34-1401, 34-1402, 34-1908; Code 1933, § 34-1301, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 19; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1198, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 42; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 56/HB 244; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 15/SB 82.

Cross references.

Penalty for destroying instruction cards, §

21-2-583

.

21-2-401.
Delivery of forms and supplies to precincts; distribution of copy of certified electors list; contents of list; authentication; return receipts; master list of county or municipal electors; items to be provided at polling place.

The cards of instruction, return sheets, tally sheets, oaths of poll officers, affidavits, and other forms and supplies required for use in each precinct, and, in precincts in which ballots are used, the official ballots prepared for use therein shall be packed by the superintendent in separate sealed packages for each precinct, marked on the outside so as to designate clearly the precincts for which they are intended and, in the case of precincts in which ballots are used, the number of ballots enclosed. They shall then be delivered by the superintendent, together with the ballot box which shall bear the designation of the precinct, to the managers in the several precincts prior to the hour appointed for opening the polls. In primaries, the parties shall decide whether to use the same ballot box or to use separate ballot boxes. The managers of the respective precincts shall, on delivery to them of such packages, return receipts therefor to the superintendent, who shall keep a record of the time when and the manner in which the several packages are delivered. The superintendent may, in the superintendent’s discretion, require the managers of the respective precincts to call at the superintendent’s office to obtain such packages.

The registrars shall, prior to the hour appointed for opening the polls, place in the possession of the managers in each precinct one copy of the certified electors list for such precinct, such list to contain all the information required by law. The list shall indicate the name of any elector who has been mailed or delivered an absentee ballot. The list for a given precinct may be divided into as many alphabetical sections as is deemed necessary. Such list of electors shall be authenticated by the signatures of at least two of the registrars. In a municipal primary, where the parties do not agree to have only one set of managers for a precinct, the electors list shall be delivered to the chief manager of the political party which polled the highest number of votes in the precinct in the immediately preceding election of the presiding officer of the governing authority. In addition, the registrars shall at the same time place in the possession of the managers in each precinct one copy of the list of inactive electors for such precinct. The managers of the respective precincts shall, on delivery to them of such electors lists, return receipts therefor to the registrars, who shall keep a record of the time when and the manner in which the electors lists are delivered. The registrars may, in their discretion, require the managers of the respective precincts to call at their office to obtain such lists.

The registrars may, in their discretion, place a master list containing the names and proper voting precincts of all electors and all inactive electors of the county or municipality at some or all of the polling places located in the county or municipality on the day of each election for use by the poll workers to assist electors in locating their proper precinct.

The superintendent shall provide at the polling place copies of the sample or facsimile ballots for such primary or election as well as a list of the certified write-in candidates for such election in the form as provided by the Secretary of State or appropriate municipal official pursuant to Code Section 21-2-133.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 115, § 9; Civil Code 1895, § 59; Civil Code 1910, § 67; Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, § 5; Code 1933, §§ 34-701, 34-1906; Ga. L. 1946, p. 75, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1204, § 38; Ga. L. 1958, p. 269, § 32; Code 1933, § 34-1303, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 22; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 16/SB 82.

Cross references.

Penalty for destruction of supplies furnished in order to enable electors to vote at polling places, §

21-2-583

.

21-2-402.
Preparation of voter’s certificates by Secretary of State; form of certificates; binders for certificates; other voter’s certificates.

At each primary and election, the Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish to each superintendent a suitable number of voter’s certificates which shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

The voter’s certificates shall be so prepared as to be capable of being inserted by the poll officers in a suitable binder for each primary or election. The binder shall have written thereon the words “Voter’s Certificates” and shall have a space for filling in the designation of the precinct and the date of the primary or election.

The election superintendent may obtain or may create and provide other voter’s certificates, provided that such other voter’s certificates are in the form required under this Code section and are approved by the Secretary of State.

VOTER’S CERTIFICATE I hereby certify that I am qualified to vote at the (primary or election) held on , that I have not and will not vote elsewhere in this (primary or election) in my own name or in any other name, and that I am a citizen of the United States and am not currently serving a sentence for a felony conviction. I understand that making a false statement on this certificate is a felony under Code Section 21-2-562 Signature Current residence address of elector: Elector’s date of birth: Name or initials of poll officer receiving voter’s certificate: In case of physical disability or illiteracy, fill out the following: Reason for assistance (Check appropriate square): ( ) Elector is unable to read the English language. ( ) Elector requires assistance due to physical disability. Signature of poll officer Number of stub of ballot or number of admission to voting machine: _

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1302, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, §§ 20, 21; Ga. L. 1977, p. 313, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 23; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 16; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 24; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 17; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 35; Ga. L. 2006, p. 888, § 5/HB 1435.

21-2-403.
Time for opening and closing of polls; extended poll hours.

At all primaries and elections the polls shall be opened at 7:00 A.M. eastern standard time or eastern daylight time, whichever is applicable, and shall remain open continuously until 7:00 P.M. eastern standard time or eastern daylight time, whichever is applicable, at which time they shall be closed; provided, however, that, in all cities having a population of 300,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census, the polls shall remain open continuously until 8:00 P.M. eastern standard time or eastern daylight time, whichever is applicable, during the cities’ general elections, at which time they shall be closed and provided, further, that, in a special election held to fill a vacancy in an office in which the district represented by such office lies wholly within the boundaries of a city, the polls shall close at the same time as for a municipal general election in such city.

Poll hours at a precinct may be extended only by order of a judge of the superior court of the county in which the precinct is located upon good cause shown by clear and convincing evidence that persons were unable to vote at that precinct during a specific period or periods of time. Poll hours shall not be extended longer than the total amount of time during which persons were unable to vote at such precinct. Any order extending poll hours at a precinct beyond 9:00 P.M. shall be by written order with specific findings of fact supporting such extension.

History.

Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 24, § 1; Code 1868, § 1313; Code 1873, § 1286; Code 1882, § 1286; Civil Code 1895, § 70; Ga. L. 1898, p. 93, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 80; Code 1933, § 34-1302; Ga. L. 1941, p. 321, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 480, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1304, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 311, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 31/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-404.
Affording employees time off to vote.

Each employee in this state shall, upon reasonable notice to his or her employer, be permitted by his or her employer to take any necessary time off from his or her employment to vote in any municipal, county, state, or federal political party primary or election for which such employee is qualified and registered to vote on the day on which such primary or election is held; provided, however, that such necessary time off shall not exceed two hours; and provided, further, that, if the hours of work of such employee commence at least two hours after the opening of the polls or end at least two hours prior to the closing of the polls, then the time off for voting as provided for in this Code section shall not be available. The employer may specify the hours during which the employee may absent himself or herself as provided in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 253, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Allowing of excused absences to students to enable them to register or vote, §

20-2-292

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of the State Personnel Board, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Personnel Board, Chapter 478-1.

21-2-405.
Meeting of poll officers at place of primary or election; oaths; failure of poll officer to appear; custodians of voting materials; temporary absence or disability; poll workers working less than entire day.

The chief manager and two assistant managers shall meet in the respective places appointed for holding the primary or election in each precinct at least one hour before the hour for opening the polls on the day of each primary or election. The other required poll officers shall meet in the respective places appointed for holding the primary or election in each precinct at least 30 minutes before the hour for opening the polls on the day of each primary or election. Before entering upon their duties at any primary or election, all poll officers shall take and subscribe in duplicate to the oaths required by this chapter.

If any chief manager shall not appear at the polling place by 7:00 A.M. on the day of any primary or election, the assistant managers shall appoint a chief manager who is qualified under this chapter. If any assistant manager shall not appear at such hour, the chief manager shall appoint an assistant manager who is qualified under this chapter. If, for any reason, any vacancy in the office of manager shall not have been filled by 7:30 A.M., the electors of the precinct, present at such time, shall elect a qualified person to fill such vacancy. If any clerk shall not appear by 7:00 A.M., the chief manager shall fill such vacancy by appointing a qualified person therefor. Any person thus appointed or elected to fill a vacancy shall take and subscribe in duplicate to the appropriate oath required by this chapter.

After the poll officers of a precinct have been organized, the chief manager shall designate one of the assistant managers to have custody of the electors list. In precincts in which ballots are used, the other assistant manager shall have charge of the receipt and deposit of ballots in the ballot box, the chief manager or one of the clerks shall issue the ballots to electors after they are found entitled to vote, and the other clerk shall have custody of the voter’s certificate binder and shall place the voter’s certificates therein as they are received and approved. In precincts in which voting machines are used, the other assistant manager or clerk shall have custody of the voter’s certificate binder and shall place the voter’s certificates therein as they are received and approved, and the chief manager shall have special charge of the operation of the voting machine; provided, however, that the chief manager may make other arrangements for the division of the duties imposed by this chapter, so long as each poll officer is assigned some specific duty to perform. In municipal primaries being held with separate precinct managers, the chief managers appointed by each party shall jointly appoint the person or persons to be in charge of the electors list. In all precincts, the chief manager shall assign an assistant manager or a clerk to keep a numbered list of voters, in sufficient counterparts, during the progress of the voting.

Any poll officer may be assigned by the chief manager to assist another officer in the performance of his or her duties or to perform them for him during his or her temporary absence or disability.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a county or municipality from offering poll officers, other than the chief manager and assistant managers, the option of working part of an election day, rather than the entire day from the opening of the polls to the closing of the polls and completion of the required duties following the closing of the polls. In such cases, any poll officer who begins a shift of work after the opening of the polls shall take and subscribe the same oath as required of poll officers in subsection (a) of this Code section and shall handle such duties as assigned by the chief manager.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 1228, 1233; Code 1868, §§ 1309, 1314; Code 1873, §§ 1282, 1287; Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 151, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 1282, 1287; Civil Code 1895, §§ 66, 71; Civil Code 1910, §§ 76, 81; Code 1933, § 34-1201; Code 1933, § 34-1308, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 5; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 23; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 43.

21-2-406.
Public performance of duties by officials.

Superintendents, poll officers, and other officials engaged in the conducting of primaries and elections held under this chapter shall perform their duties in public.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 115, § 16; Civil Code 1895, § 65; Civil Code 1910, § 75; Code 1933, § 34-1102; Code 1933, § 34-1309, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-407.
Duty of registrars to review qualifications of electors who may have been erroneously omitted from list of electors; authority to place such electors on the list.

The registrars shall meet at their main office during each primary or election for the purpose of considering the qualification of electors whose names may have been omitted by inadvertence or mistake from the list of electors. The registrars shall be authorized to place the names of such electors on the registration list or make other corrections to the list as necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 353, § 3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1204, § 52; Ga. L. 1958, p. 269, § 42; Code 1933, § 34-1305, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 36.